Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 321.015 is amended to read:
321.015. (1) For the calendar years beginning  January 1, [ 2024] 2026, and January 1, [ 2025]
2027, there is levied  a privilege tax of 90.00 cents per thousand feet, board measure, upon taxpayers
for the privilege of harvesting of all merchantable forest products harvested on  forestlands. Subject
to ORS 321.145, the proceeds of the tax shall be transferred as provided in ORS 321.152  (2) to the
Forest Research and Experiment Account for  use for the forest resource research, experimentation
and studies described in  ORS 526.215 and for the Forest Research Laboratory established under ORS
526.225.
(2) Except as provided in ORS  477.760, in addition to the tax levied by subsection (1) of this
section,  there  is levied a forest products harvest tax upon taxpayers of 62.5 cents per thousand feet,
board measure, for the privilege of harvesting  all merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands for the payment of benefits related to fire suppression as provided in ORS 321.005 to
321.185, 321.560 to 321.600 and 477.440 to 477.460.
(3) For the calendar years beginning January 1, [ 2024] 2026, and January 1, [ 2025] 2027, in ad-
dition to  the taxes levied under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, there is levied a privilege tax
upon taxpayers for the privilege of harvesting all  merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands in the amount of [ 253.46] 265.44 cents per  thousand feet, board measure, for the purpose
of administering the Oregon Forest Practices Act in an amount  not to exceed 40 percent of the total
expenditures approved by the Legislative Assembly for this purpose,  including salary adjustments
approved by the Legislative Assembly for fiscal years [ 2024] 2026 and [ 2025] 2027.
(4) For the calendar years beginning January 1, [ 2024] 2026, and January 1, [ 2025] 2027, in ad-
dition to the taxes levied by subsections (1) to (3) of this section, there is levied  a privilege tax of
21 cents  per thousand feet, board measure, upon taxpayers for the privilege of harvesting all
merchantable forest products harvested on forestlands.  Subject to ORS 321.145, the proceeds of the
tax shall be transferred as provided in ORS 321.152 (5) to the subaccount established pursuant to
ORS 350.520 for use by Oregon State University for the purpose of making investments in profes-
sional forestry education at the College of Forestry.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the taxes shall be measured by and be applicable
to each per thousand feet, board measure, on the total quantity of forest products  harvested in this
state measured by use of any log scale which is or  may be in general use in the logging industry
Enrolled House Bill 2072 (HB 2072-A) Page 1
and which is designed to measure total volume of merchantable forest products in board feet. How-
ever, if the Department of Revenue finds that the scale  used by any taxpayer in computing the taxes
due under ORS  321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600 does not accurately reflect the total
quantity of  merchantable forest products harvested by the taxpayer, it may require the taxpayer to
adopt another log scale in general use in the industry which in the department’s opinion  will accu-
rately reflect merchantable harvest in board feet.
(6) The first 25,000 feet, board measure, of forest products harvested annually by  any taxpayer
during each  calendar year shall be excluded from the total quantity of harvested forest products
that constitutes the measure of the taxes under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600.
(7)(a) Not later than March 10 of each  odd-numbered year, the Legislative Assembly shall begin
considering the biennial  forest products harvest tax rates levied under subsections (1), (3) and (4)
of this section.
(b) Upon request of the Legislative Revenue Officer  or the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the State
Forestry  Department  shall provide the respective officers with relevant timber harvest data for the
purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2072 (HB 2072-A) Page 2